Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Public Employes Deferred Compensation Plans

18.510.
Definitions. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.520.
Definitions. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.530.
Trust fund. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.540.
Board of trustees — Membership, terms, meetings — Powers — Annual financial report. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.550.
Participation in plan — Deductions from wages authorized — Deposit of money. [Repealed and reenacted.]

18.560.
Investments. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.570.
Regulation of investments. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.580.
Deferred compensation program to be in addition to retirement or benefit program. [Repealed and reenacted.]

18.590.
Local programs. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

18.600.
Custodians of funds. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]